North Carolina, session 2025, HB233.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of thirteen thousand two hundred fifteen dollars ($13,215) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of
Milton for repairs at the Town's wastewater pump station.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H233-v-1*